apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="persons">      <!-- Ásta Árnadóttir, Ásta Á. Árnadóttir -->
  <e>       <re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+dóttir</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
      <!-- Davíð Oddsson, Davíð D. Oddsson -->
  <e>       <re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+sson</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
  <e>       <re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+sen</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Flammie__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="Abas">            <i>Abas</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Africom">         <i>Africom</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alcazar">         <i>Alcazar</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amalie">          <i>Amalie</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Applebee">        <i>Applebee</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ashdown">         <i>Ashdown</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Auslander">       <i>Auslander</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="BAE">             <i>BAE</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bagerhat">        <i>Bagerhat</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="BarCap">          <i>BarCap</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beardsley">       <i>Beardsley</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beltway">         <i>Beltway</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bethesda">        <i>Bethesda</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Birkenhead">      <i>Birkenhead</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bolingbrook">     <i>Bolingbrook</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bowser">          <i>Bowser</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Brookline">       <i>Brookline</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Buster">          <i>Buster</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="CGI">             <i>CGI</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Canfield">        <i>Canfield</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ceferin">         <i>Ceferin</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chelios">         <i>Chelios</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Choza">           <i>Choza</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Clyde">           <i>Clyde</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Condi">           <i>Condi</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Coulter">         <i>Coulter</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cueto">           <i>Cueto</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="DKK">             <i>DKK</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Daubenton">       <i>Daubenton</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dementieva">      <i>Dementieva</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Didcot">          <i>Didcot</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dongalor">        <i>Dongalor</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Duplinski">       <i>Duplinski</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="EMCDDA">          <i>EMCDDA</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edington">        <i>Edington</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Enarotali">       <i>Enarotali</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ernee">           <i>Ernee</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Europeandefence"> <i>Europeandefence</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="F599">            <i>F599</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="FSTR">            <i>FSTR</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fathi">           <i>Fathi</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Filipe">          <i>Filipe</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Florrick">        <i>Florrick</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francois">        <i>Francois</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fútbol">          <i>Fútbol</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Garofalo">        <i>Garofalo</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gettelfinger">    <i>Gettelfinger</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Godinez">         <i>Godinez</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Grassie">         <i>Grassie</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Grönlund">        <i>Grönlund</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="HMP">             <i>HMP</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hal">             <i>Hal</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Harington">       <i>Harington</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hazelhoff">       <i>Hazelhoff</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hibi">            <i>Hibi</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Holmgren">        <i>Holmgren</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Huhne">           <i>Huhne</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="IBS">             <i>IBS</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iines">           <i>Iines</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Insta">           <i>Insta</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iuventa">         <i>Iuventa</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jama">            <i>Jama</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jenkyns">         <i>Jenkyns</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jorma">           <i>Jorma</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="KIHU">            <i>KIHU</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kam">             <i>Kam</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kathkleen">       <i>Kathkleen</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Keffi">           <i>Keffi</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kermit">          <i>Kermit</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kingussie">       <i>Kingussie</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kola">            <i>Kola</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kurylenko">       <i>Kurylenko</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lacy">            <i>Lacy</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lannisport">      <i>Lannisport</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Leavenworth">     <i>Leavenworth</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Levin">           <i>Levin</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Linz">            <i>Linz</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lotta">           <i>Lotta</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lutis">           <i>Lutis</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="MCDaniel">        <i>MCDaniel</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="MIFID">           <i>MIFID</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maddow">          <i>Maddow</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Manatee">         <i>Manatee</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="MariaDB">         <i>MariaDB</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mastercard">      <i>Mastercard</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mazatlan">        <i>Mazatlan</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Meacham">         <i>Meacham</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mendocino">       <i>Mendocino</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Minnie">          <i>Minnie</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mousasi">         <i>Mousasi</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="N.C.">            <i>N.C.</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Napoli">          <i>Napoli</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nolting">         <i>Nolting</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oakwood">         <i>Oakwood</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Orrin">           <i>Orrin</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pais">            <i>Pais</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pekka">           <i>Pekka</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pincus">          <i>Pincus</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pori">            <i>Pori</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="QRIO">            <i>QRIO</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raija">           <i>Raija</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Reeva">           <i>Reeva</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rockies">         <i>Rockies</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rushden">         <i>Rushden</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saks">            <i>Saks</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Scarpa">          <i>Scarpa</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Seve">            <i>Seve</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sibley">          <i>Sibley</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Snapchat">        <i>Snapchat</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sri">             <i>Sri</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Subandono">       <i>Subandono</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="TMZ.com">         <i>TMZ.com</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tebai">           <i>Tebai</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tollcross">       <i>Tollcross</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tweezerman">      <i>Tweezerman</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Uribe">           <i>Uribe</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ville">           <i>Ville</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wasilla">         <i>Wasilla</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Woodrow">         <i>Woodrow</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yong-ho">         <i>Yong-ho</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e lm="al-Almani">       <i>al-almani</i><par n="Flammie__np"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="persons"/></e>
